Alaska statutes. Title 15. Elections.
Article 2. Census and Population.

Sec. 15.10.200.
Definition of “decennial census of the United States” and use of census numbers by redistricting board.

In art. VI, Constitution of the State of Alaska, reference to the official decennial census of the United States is a reference to the census enumeration used to establish apportionment among the several states.

In adopting a redistricting plan under art. VI, Constitution of the State of Alaska, the redistricting board may not adjust the census numbers by using estimates, population surveys, or sampling for the purpose of excluding or discriminating among persons counted based on race, religion, color, national origin, sex, age, occupation, military or civilian status, or length of residency.

A qualified voter may bring an action in the superior court against the redistricting board to enforce the provisions of (b) of this section.

History.

(§ 3 ch 18 SLA 1999)

Collateral references. —

Propriety of using census data as basis for governmental regulations or activities. 56 ALR5th 171.

Sec. 15.10.210.
Expenditures for population surveys or sampling prohibited.

An expenditure of public funds may not be made for a population survey or sampling conducted for purposes of redistricting the legislature without an express appropriation by the legislature for that purpose.

History.

(§ 3 ch 18 SLA 1999)

Sec. 15.10.220.
Voting Rights Act review and legal representation.

The independent legal counsel for the Redistricting Board provided for in art. VI, sec. 9, Constitution of the State of Alaska, shall

submit the board’s redistricting plan for preclearance to the United States Department of Justice or the United States District Court for the District of Columbia under 42 U.S.C. 1973c; and

defend the plan and board in all matters concerning redistricting until a final plan for redistricting and a proclamation of redistricting have been adopted and all challenges to them brought under art. VI, sec. 11, Constitution of the State of Alaska, have been resolved after final remand or affirmation; the board shall have sole discretion to enter a settlement agreement and control litigation strategy that affects the final proclamation issued under art. VI, sec. 10, Constitution of the State of Alaska.

Nothing in this section denies or creates standing in the governor, the legislature, or another person to be a party to the proceedings described in subsection (a).

History.

(§ 3 ch 18 SLA 1999)

Editor's notes. —

The provisions of this chapter refer to 42 U.S.C. 1973 et seq., (National Voter Registration Act of 1993), which was renumbered in 2014 as 52 U.S.C. 10101, et seq., by the U.S. House of Representatives, Office of Law Revision Counsel.